Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2605
Permit; issuance; conditions.

No permit shall be granted for the location and maintenance of a junkyard within one thousand feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any roadway of the Highway Beautification Control System except the following:

(1) Those which are screened by natural objects, plantings, fences or other appropriate means so as not to be visible from the main-traveled way of the system, or otherwise removed from sight;

(2) Those located within areas which are zoned for industrial use under authority of the law of a municipality or county, except those located along any route designated as a scenic byway;

(3) Those located within unzoned industrial areas, which areas shall be determined from actual land uses and defined by rules to be promulgated by the department, except those located along any route designated as a scenic byway; and

(4) Those which are not visible from the main-traveled way of the system.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 28.